California, session 20252026, AB2462.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 108042 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:108042. As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Brand” means a trademark, including both a registered trademark and an unregistered trademark, a logo, a name, a symbol, a word, an identifier, or a traceable mark that identifies a product and identifies the owner or licensee of the brand.(a)(b) “Commercial dealer” means any person who deals in products or who otherwise by his or her their occupation holds himself or herself themself out as having knowledge or skill peculiar to products, or any person who is in the business of remanufacturing, retrofitting, selling, leasing, subletting, or otherwise placing into the stream of commerce, commerce a product.(c) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery or a successor.(b)(d) “Distributor” and “wholesaler” means any person, other than a manufacturer or retailer, who sells or resells, or otherwise places into the stream of commerce, a product.(c)(e) “End consumer” means a person who purchases a product for any purpose other than resale.(d)(f) “First seller” means any retailer selling a product that has not been used or has not previously been owned. A first seller does not include an entity such as a secondhand retail dealer, thrift shop, resale store, or any other establishment or individual, agent, or employee thereof that sells, distributes, rents, or leases products of any kind.(e)(g) “Importer” means any person who brings into this country, and places into the stream of commerce, a product.(f)(h) (1) “Manufacturer” means any person who makes, and places into the stream of commerce, a product. manufactures a product and who owns or is the licensee of the brand or trademark under which that product is sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in, or into, the state.(2) For purposes of this chapter, the sale of a product shall be deemed to occur in the state if the product is delivered to the purchaser in the state.(g)(i) “Person” means a natural person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or association, or an employee or agent thereof.(h)(j) “Product” means any article, or component part thereof, produced or distributed (1) for sale to a consumer for use in or around a permanent or temporary household or residence, a school, in recreation, or otherwise, or (2) for personal use, consumption, or enjoyment of a consumer in or around a permanent or temporary household or residence, a school, in recreation, or otherwise. “Product” does not include food, drugs, cosmetics, pesticides (as defined by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.)), medical devices, firearms and ammunition, boats, motor vehicles, motor vehicle equipment, aircraft, or tobacco and tobacco products.(i)(k) “Recall” means any repair, replacement, or refund program implemented in accordance with the federal Consumer Product Safety Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2051 et seq.) upon the determination of commission staff that a consumer product violates a commission statute or regulation, and notification to the product manufacturer, importer, distributor, or retailer that corrective action to address the violation is warranted. “Recall” includes a voluntary recall where a product is returned to the manufacturer for repair or replacement, usually due to defects or safety concerns, or public notice that a product is defective and must be returned to the manufacturer or retailer.(j)(l) “Retailer” means any person other than a manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler who sells, distributes, sublets, or leases consumer goods of any kind.(m) “Thrift retail store” has the same meaning as subdivision (a) of Section 65631 of the Government Code.(k)(n)  “Sell” or “sale” means a transfer for consideration of title or of the right to use, by lease or sales contract, including, but not limited to, transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet internet or any other similar electronic means.SEC. 2. Section 108046 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:108046. (a) A commercial dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor, or wholesaler that has placed into the stream of commerce any unsafe product for which a recall or warning has subsequently been issued, shall initiate the following steps within 24 hours after issuing or receiving the recall notice or warning:(1) Contact all of its customers, other than end consumers, to whom it sold, leased, sublet, or transferred that particular product. The contact shall be made to a person designated for that product by the customer and shall include a copy of the recall notice or warning.(2) If the commercial dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor, or wholesaler maintains an Internet Web site, internet website, the entity shall place prominently on the homepage home page or first point of entry of its Web site, internet website a link to recall or warning information that contains the specific recall notice or warning that was issued for the product in question. The recall or warning information shall include a description of the product, the reason for the recall or warning, a picture of the product, and instructions on how to participate in the recall or warning. The information shall include only the product recall or warning information and shall not include sales or marketing information on that product or any other product, excluding return and exchange policies. The recall or warning information shall permit participation in the recall or warning through the Web site internet website of the commercial dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor, or wholesaler.(b) (1) The manufacturer of the product shall provide for the safe return of the product to the manufacturer or the appropriate disposal of the product in the manner required pursuant to paragraph (2) at no cost to the end consumer or retailer. any of the following:(A) The end consumer.(B) A recycling center.(C) A municipal facility that accepts the product for recycling or disposal.(D) A retailer that sells the product.(E) A permitted solid waste facility.(F) A household hazardous waste collection facility, as defined in Section 25218.1.(G) A thrift retail store.(2) The manufacturer shall properly dispose of the product in a manner that is in compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and ordinances, and shall not export the product, or permit it to be exported, for disposal in a manner that poses a significant risk to the public health or the environment.(3) The manufacturer or retailer may provide a for corrective action or retrofit onsite at the consumer’s home or premises for any product for which a recall or warning has been issued.(c) If a retailer receives notice of a recall or warning regarding a product from a commercial dealer, manufacturer, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or state or federal agency, and if the retailer during the previous 18 months offered the product for sale, then the retailer shall do the following:(1) Within three days after receiving the notice or warning by the person designated by the retailer, the retailer shall remove the product from the shelves of its stores or program its registers to ensure that the item cannot be sold.(2) If the product was sold through the retailer’s Internet Web site, internet website, then within three days after receiving the notice or warning by the person designated by the retailer, the retailer shall remove the product from the Web site internet website or remove the ability to purchase the product through the Web site. internet website.(3) Within three days after receiving the recall notice or warning by the person designated by the retailer, the retailer shall post in paper form or electronically in a prominent location in each retail store the recall notice or warning. The notice or warning shall remain posted for at least 60 days.(4) If the product for which a recall or warning was issued was sold on the retailer’s Internet Web site, internet website, the retailer shall, within three days after receiving the recall notice or warning by the person designated by the retailer, post on the homepage home page or first point of entry of its Web site internet website a link to recall or warning information that contains the specific recall notice or warning that was issued for the product in question. The recall or warning information shall include a description of the product, the reason for the recall or warning, a picture of the product, if one was provided, and instructions on how to participate in the recall or warning. The information shall include only the product recall or warning information and shall not include sales or marketing information on that product or any other product, excluding return and exchange policies.(5) A retailer who is not a first seller shall comply with this subdivision, except that the retailer has five days to comply with paragraphs (1) and (2).(6) A retailer who is a first seller shall accept any recalled product for the purpose of returning it to the manufacturer or distributor.(d) A commercial dealer, manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor who is also a retailer shall comply with subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), as applicable.SEC. 3. Section 108050 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:108050.(a)Any violation of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each occurrence, up to a maximum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).108050. (a) An administrative penalty up to the following amounts may be administratively imposed by the department on any person who is in violation of any provision of this chapter:(1) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per day.(2) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day if the violation is intentional or knowing.(b) In assessing or reviewing the amount of an administrative penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for a violation of this chapter, the department or the court shall consider all of the following:(1) The nature and extent of the violation.(2) The number and severity of the violation or violations.(3) The economic effect of the penalty on the violator.(4) Whether the violator took good faith measures to comply with this chapter and the period of time over which these measures were taken.(5) The willfulness of the violator’s misconduct.(6) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated community.(7) Any other factor that justice may require.(c) The department shall establish, through regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42984.2 of the Public Resources Code, a process that shall include an informal hearing process by which the penalties will be assessed.(d) The department shall deposit all penalties collected pursuant to this section into the Product Recall Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Product Recall Penalty Account shall be available for expenditure by the department on activities related to the collection and recycling of products, grants for related purposes, and the administration and enforcement of this chapter.(e) The Administrative Adjudication Bill of Rights, as set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 11425.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, applies to hearings conducted under this chapter and mandates minimum due process.(f) The department may refer enforcement to the Department of Toxic Substances Control for products identified as hazardous waste. If the department defers to the Department of Toxic Substances Control, any penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Hazardous Product Recall Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Hazardous Product Recall Penalty Account shall be available for expenditure by the Department of Toxic Substances Control for activities related to the collection and recycling of products, grants for related purposes, and the administration and enforcement of this chapter.(b)(g) The remedies under this section are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any and all other remedies, civil or criminal.